Massachusetts, session 194th, H4973.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 5A of chapter 3 of the General Laws, section 20 of
chapter 6C of the General Laws, section 7E of chapter 81 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation or his or her designee, shall convey to the Fall River redevelopment authority
certain parcels of land, owned by the Massachusetts Department of Transportation, containing
21.55 acres of vacant land, previously taken and used for highway purposes, bounded by Davol
Street northbound on the east and Davol Street southbound on the west. The northern limit of the
parcels is Brightman Street and the southern limit is Turner Street; included are the parcels
between Turner Street and Hathway Street, and Hathway Street and President Avenue, and
President Avenue and Brightman Street, and the northern portion of Lindsey Street that is
bordered by Brightman Street in the North and Davol Street North in the city of Fall River to be
fully described on a survey to be prepared and approved by the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation. Said conveyance shall be subject to adequate compensation as set forth in section
of 4

3 of this act and agreed to by the Secretary of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation or
his or her designee and the executive director of the Fall River redevelopment authority.
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding chapter 121B of the General Laws or any other general
or special law to the contrary, the Fall River redevelopment authority may purchase from the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation subject to terms acceptable to the parties and to the
parcels of land described in this act.
(b) The Fall River redevelopment authority may develop the parcels of land described in
this act for residential, retail, commercial, restaurant and other economic development purposes,
without the necessity of adopting or adhering to an urban renewal plan, as defined in section 1 of
chapter 121B of the General Laws, and with respect to said land the Fall River redevelopment
authority shall enjoy the statutory authority it would possess for land and structures and other
property within an urban renewal project as defined by said section 1 of said chapter 121B.
SECTION 3. An independent appraisal of the full and fair market value of the parcels
described in section 1 shall be prepared in accordance with the usual and customary professional
appraisal practices by a qualified appraiser commissioned by the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance. The consideration shall be the full and fair market value or the
value in use, whichever is greater. The commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance shall submit any appraisal required pursuant to section 3 to the inspector general for
review and comment. The inspector general shall review and approve the appraisal and the
review shall include an examination of the methodology utilized for the appraisal. The inspector
general shall prepare a report and file the report with the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance. The commissioner shall submit copies of the appraisal, and the
of 4

inspector general’s review and approval and comments, if any, to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on state administration and regulatory
oversight not less than 15 days prior to the execution of documents effecting the transfers
described in section 1.
SECTION 4. The consideration for the conveyance as authorized in this act shall be $1, if
the Commonwealth did not award any payment for the parcels or part of the parcels described in
section 1 that were owned by the city of Fall River. If the Commonwealth paid for the parcels or
part of the parcels described in section 1, then consideration shall be the net proceeds of the fair
market value of each parcel described in section 1 sold or leased by the Fall River redevelopment
authority and shall be allocated between the Fall River redevelopment authority and the
commonwealth in equal shares over a 10-year period from the time of the enactment of this act.
The parcels shall be conveyed in its present condition, as is, where is and with all faults, through
the Massachusetts Department of Transportation’s standard form release deed.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Fall River
redevelopment authority shall be responsible for all costs and expenses associated with the
conveyance authorized in this act including, but not limited to, all costs associated with any
engineering, surveys, appraisals and deed preparation as such costs may be determined by the
secretary of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
SECTION 6. In the event that the parcels of land comprising 21.55 acres conveyed by
this act cease to be used by the Fall River redevelopment authority, the developers selected and
any other subsequent owners for the purposes described in section 2 of this act at any time then,
upon notice by the secretary of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation or his or her
of 4

designee, said parcels of land shall revert to the Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
Should said undeveloped parcels of land comprising the 21.55 acres revert to the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation, any further disposition thereof shall be subject to the provisions of
section 5A of chapter 3 of the General Laws, section 20 of chapter 6C of the General Laws and
section 7E of chapter 81 of the General Laws and to the prior approval of the general court.
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect upon its passage.

of 4